Wisconsin, session 2025, AB809.
do enact as follows:AB809,11Section 1. 20.9278 of the statutes is created to read:AB809,2,9220.9278 Prohibition on funding pregnancy outcome investigations. 3Except as provided in sub. (2), no funds of this state or of any county, city, village, 4town, or long-term care district under s. 46.2895 or of any subdivision or agency of 5this state, including an authority created in ch. 233, or of any subdivision or agency 6of any county, city, village, or town and no federal funds passing through the state 7treasury shall be authorized for or paid to any person to subsidize, reimburse, or 8otherwise provide compensation for the investigation of a person as a crime suspect 9because of any pregnancy outcome that the person has experienced.AB809,2,1110(2) The prohibition under sub. (1) does not apply to the department of health 11services with regard to the requirements under s. 69.186.AB809,212Section 2. 175.43 of the statutes is created to read:AB809,3,21175.43 Investigation of pregnancy outcomes. (1) Definitions. In this 2section:AB809,3,33(a) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.83 (1) (b). AB809,3,64(b) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (c) and 5includes a tactical emergency medical services professional, as defined in s. 165.85 6(2) (fh), certified under s. 165.85 (3).AB809,3,97(2) Investigation of pregnancy outcomes. (a) No law enforcement officer 8or law enforcement agency may investigate a person as a crime suspect because of 9any pregnancy outcome that the person has experienced.AB809,3,1410(b) A law enforcement officer or law enforcement agency may investigate a 11case in which the conduct that constitutes a crime is related to any pregnancy 12outcome of a person other than the crime suspect only if the law enforcement officer 13or law enforcement agency first obtains the consent of the person whose pregnancy 14was affected.AB809,315Section 3. 895.539 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB809,3,1916895.539 (2) No woman shall be held civilly liable for, discriminated against, or 17otherwise punished or penalized for the outcome of her own pregnancy, including 18stillbirth, miscarriage, abortion, or any other pregnancy outcome that does not 19result in a live birth.AB809,420Section 4. 939.75 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB809,3,2321939.75 (2) (b) 1. An act committed during an induced abortion. This 22subdivision does not limit the applicability of ss. 895.539 (1), 940.04, 940.13, 940.15 23and 940.16 to an induced abortion.AB809,524Section 5. 940.11 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB809,4,21940.11 (4) For purposes of this subsection, “corpse” does not include fetal 2tissue that is the result of a pregnancy outcome other than a live birth or stillbirth.AB809,63Section 6. 940.13 of the statutes is renumbered 895.539 (1) and amended to 4read:AB809,4,135895.539 Abortion exception Civil and criminal liability exemptions; 6pregnancy outcomes. (1) No fine or imprisonment may be imposed or enforced 7against and no prosecution may be brought against a woman who obtains an 8abortion or otherwise violates any provision of any abortion statute with respect to 9her unborn child or fetus, and s. or against a woman for the outcome of her own 10pregnancy, including stillbirth, miscarriage, abortion, or any other pregnancy 11outcome that does not result in a live birth. Sections 939.05, 939.30 or and 939.31 12does do not apply to a woman who obtains an abortion or otherwise violates any 13provision of any abortion statute with respect to her unborn child or fetus.AB809,714Section 7. 948.23 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB809,4,1615948.23 (4) For purposes of this subsection, “corpse” does not include fetal 16tissue that is the result of a pregnancy outcome other than a live birth or stillbirth.AB809,4,1717